Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1239
Contracts for services authorized.

In order to prevent unnecessary expense and duplication of functions and to promote uniform and effective administration of relocation assistance programs, an agency may enter into contracts with any person for services in connection with such programs or may carry out its functions through any federal, state, or local agency having an established organization for conducting relocation assistance programs.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 26.